ja: クラッチスレーブシリンダー接続タイプ: AN/JICフィッティング; バンジョーボルト; フレアフィッティング; ホースバーブ; クイックコネクト; ネジ式ポート; その他
zh-CN: 离合器从动缸连接类型: AN/JIC 接头; Banjo 螺栓; 扩口接头; 软管接头; 快速连接; 螺纹口; 其他
sl-SI: Vrsta povezave pomožnih valjev sklopke: AN/JIC priključek; Banjo vijak; Razširjen priključek; Cevni nastavek z rebri; Hitri priključek; Navojni priključek; Drugo
zh-TW: 離合器分泵連接類型: AN/JIC 接頭; 班卓螺栓; 擴口接頭; 軟管倒刺接頭; 快速接頭; 螺紋接口; 其他
bg-BG: Тип свързване на долните помпи за съединител: AN/JIC фитинг; Банджо болт; Фитинг с отбортовка; Щуцер за маркуч; Бърза връзка; Отвор с резба; Други
sk-SK: Typ pripojenia pomocných valcov spojky: Spojka AN/JIC; Skrutka banjo; Lemovaná spojka; Hadicový tŕň; Rýchlospojka; Závitový port; Iné
es: Tipo de conexión de los cilindros esclavos del embrague: Conector AN/JIC; Perno de banjo; Conector abocardado; Espiga para manguera; Conexión rápida; Puerto roscado; Otro
pt-PT: Tipo de ligação do cilindro escravo da embraiagem: Encaixe AN/JIC; Parafuso banjo; Encaixe abocardado; Espigão para mangueira; Ligação rápida; Porta roscada; Outro
tr: Debriyaj alt merkez silindiri bağlantı tipi: AN/JIC bağlantısı; Banjo cıvatası; Havşalı bağlantı; Hortum rakoru; Hızlı bağlantı; Dişli yuva; Diğer
nb: Tilkoblingstype for clutch-slavesylinder: AN/JIC-kobling; Banjobolt; Flenskobling; Slangestuss; Hurtigkobling; Gjenget port; Annet
pt-BR: Tipo de conexão do cilindro auxiliar da embreagem: Conexão AN/JIC; Parafuso banjo; Conexão flangeada; Espigão para mangueira; Engate rápido; Porta roscada; Outras
ro-RO: Tipul de conexiune a cilindrului receptor al ambreiajului: Racord AN/JIC; Șurub Banjo; Racord evazat; Ștuț pentru furtun; Conectare rapidă; Port filetat; Altele
sv: Typ av anslutning koppling med slavcylindrar: AN/JIC-koppling; Banjobult; Konkoppling; Slangnippel; Snabbkoppling; Gängad port; Övrigt
th: ประเภทการเชื่อมต่อกระบอกสูบคลัตช์: ข้อต่อ AN/JIC; โบลต์แบนโจ; ข้อต่อหัวบาน; ข้อต่อหางปลา; ข้อต่อสวมเร็ว; ช่องเสียบแบบมีเกลียว; อื่นๆ
lt-LT: Sankabos darbinio cilindro jungties tipas: AN / JIC jungtis; „Banjo“ varžtas; Platėjanti jungtis; Žarnos antgalis su užkarpomis; Greitoji jungtis; Srieginė anga; Kita
hr-HR: Vrsta priključka pomoćnog cilindra spojke: AN/JIC priključak; Banjo vijak; Prošireni priključak; Nazubljeni priključak; Brza spojka; Navojni priključak; Ostalo
el: Τύπος σύνδεσης δευτερεύοντος κυλίνδρου συμπλέκτη: Ρακόρ AN/JIC; Βίδα banjo; Ρακόρ με κώνο; Ρακόρ εύκαμπτου σωλήνα; Ταχυσύνδεσμος; Θύρα με σπείρωμα; Άλλο
da: Tilslutningstype for koblingens slavecylinder: AN/JIC-fitting; Banjobolt; Kravefitting; Slangestuds; Kvik-kobling; Gevindport; Andet
hu: Kuplung munkahenger csatlakozási típusa: AN/JIC csatlakozó; Banjocsavar; Peremes csatlakozó; Tömlővég; Gyorscsatlakozó; Menetes csatlakozó; Egyéb
cs: Typ připojení pomocného válce spojky: Šroubení AN/JIC; Průtokový šroub; Lemované šroubení; Hadicový trn; Rychlospojka; Závitový port; Jiné
fi: Kytkimen työsylinterin liitäntätyyppi: AN/JIC-liitin; Banjopultti; Kartioliitin; Letkukara; Pikaliitin; Kierteitetty liitäntä; Muu
nl: Aansluittype koppelingscilinder: AN/JIC-fitting; Banjobout; Felsfitting; Slangtule; Snelkoppeling; Poort met schroefdraad; Overig
en: Clutch slave cylinder connection type: AN/JIC fitting; Banjo bolt; Flare fitting; Hose barb; Quick-connect; Threaded port; Other
ko: 클러치 슬레이브 실린더 연결 유형: AN/JIC 피팅; 반조 볼트; 플레어 피팅; 호스 바브; 퀵 커넥트; 나사형 포트; 기타
pl: Typ podłączenia siłownika hydraulicznego wyprzęgającego: Złączka AN/JIC; Śruba drążona (banjo); Złącze stożkowe; Króciec na wąż; Szybkozłącze; Port gwintowany; Inne
ru: Тип подключения рабочего цилиндра сцепления: Фитинг AN/JIC; Болт банджо; Развальцованный фитинг; Штуцер-елочка; Быстроразъемное соединение; Резьбовой порт; Другое
it: Tipo di connessione del cilindro secondario della frizione: Raccordo AN/JIC; Bullone banjo; Raccordo a cartella; Portagomma; Connessione rapida; Porta filettata; Altro
vi: Kiểu kết nối xi-lanh con của ly hợp: Đầu nối AN/JIC; Bu-lông banjo; Đầu nối loe; Đuôi chuột (Hose barb); Kết nối nhanh; Cổng ren; Khác
fr: Type de raccordement du cylindre récepteur d'embrayage: Raccord AN/JIC; Boulon banjo; Raccord évasé; Embout cannelé; Raccord rapide; Orifice fileté; Autre
de: Anschlusstyp des Kupplungsnehmerzylinders: AN/JIC-Verschraubung; Hohlschraube; Bördelverschraubung; Schlauchtülle; Schnellkupplung; Gewindeanschluss; Andere